Utah statutes.
38-9-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Interest holder" means a person who holds or possesses a present, lawful property interest in certain real property, including an owner, title holder, mortgagee, trustee, or beneficial owner.

(2)  "Lien claimant" means a person claiming an interest in real property who offers a document for recording or filing with any county recorder in the state asserting a lien, or notice of interest, or other claim of interest in certain real property.

(3)  "Owner" means a person who has a vested ownership interest in certain real property.

(4) (a)  "Record interest holder" means a person who holds or possesses a present, lawful property interest in certain real property, including an owner, titleholder, mortgagee, trustee, or beneficial owner, and whose name and interest in that real property appears in the county recorder's records for the county in which the property is located.

(b)  "Record interest holder" includes any grantor in the chain of the title in certain real property.

(5)  "Record owner" means an owner whose name and ownership interest in certain real property is recorded or filed in the county recorder's records for the county in which the property is located.

(6)  "Wrongful lien" means any document that purports to create a lien, notice of interest, or encumbrance on an owner's interest in certain real property and at the time it is recorded is not:

(a)  expressly authorized by this chapter or another state or federal statute;

(b)  authorized by or contained in an order or judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction in the state; or

(c)  signed by or authorized pursuant to a document signed by the owner of the real property.



Amended by Chapter 381, 2010 General Session

